en: Preparations for fondue
fr: Préparations pour fondue

en: Processed cheeses, Processed cheese, Melted cheese
bg: Преработени сирена, Топено сирене
de: Schmelzkäse
es: Queso procesado, Queso fundido
fi: sulatejuusto, sulatettu juusto
fr: Fromages fondus, Fromage fondu, Fromages à pâte fondue, snack à base de fromage fondu
hr: Topljeni sir, Rastopljeni sir
it: Formaggio fuso, Prodotti a base di formaggio trasformato
ja: プロセスチーズ
lt: Apdoroti sūriai, Lydyti sūriai
nl: Smeltkazen
pl: Sery topione, Ser topiony
pt: Queijos derretidos, Queijo processado
ro: Brânză topită
ru: Плавленый сыр

en: Cancoillottes, Cancoyottes, Processed cheese from cow's milk
xx: Cancoillottes
de: Kochkäse
es: Cancoillottes, Cancoyottes
fr: Cancoillottes, Cancoillotte, Spécialité fromagère fondue
hr: Cancoillottes
nl: Cancoillotes

en: Processed cheese with fresh cream cheese and walnuts
fr: Spécialité fromagère fondante au fromage blanc et aux noix
hr: Topljeni sir sa svježim krem ​​sirom i orasima
pt: Queijo processado com creme de queijo fresco e nozes

en: Processed cheese in slices
fr: Fromage fondu en tranchettes

en: Processed cheese double cream around 31% fat
fr: Fromage fondu double crème environ 31% MG

en: Processed cheese around 20% fat in wedges
fr: Fromage fondu en portions environ 20% MG

en: Cubed appetizer cheese, Processed cheese around 20% fat in cubes
fr: Fromages apéritif fondus en cubes, fromage apéritif en cube, fromage apéritif en cube type Apéricube, Fromage fondu en cubes environ 20% MG

en: Cheese appetizers
fr: Fromages apéritif

en: Cheeses
af: Kaas
an: Queso
ar: جبن
ay: Kisu
az: Pendir
be: Сыр
bg: Сирене и кашкавал
bn: পনির
bo: ཆུར་བ།
br: Keuz
bs: Sir
ca: formatge
cs: sýr
cv: Чăкăт
cy: Caws
da: ost
de: Käse
el: Τυρί
eo: fromaĝo
es: Quesos
et: juust
eu: Gazta
fa: پنیر
fi: juusto
fr: Fromages, fromagerie
fy: tsiis
ga: Cáis
gd: Càise
gl: Queixo
gu: ચીઝ
gv: Caashey
he: גבינה
hi: चीज़
hr: sirevi
ht: Fromaj
hu: Sajt, Sajtok
hy: Պանիր
ia: Caseo
id: keju
io: Fromajo
is: Ostur
it: Formaggi, formaggio
ja: チーズ
jv: Kèju
ka: ყველი
kk: Ірімшік
ko: 치즈
ku: Penîr
ky: Сыр
la: Caseus
lb: Kéis
lt: Sūriai, Sūris
nl: Kazen, Kaas
no: Oster, Ost
pl: Sery
pt: Queijos
ro: Brânzeturi, Brânză, cascaval, cașcaval
ru: Сыры
sv: Ostar, Ost
th: ชีส
tr: Peynir
zh: 奶酪, 乳酪, 芝士, 起司

en: Canned cheeses
de: Dosenkäse, Käsekonserve
fr: Fromages en conserve
hr: Konzervirani sirevi
hu: Konzerv sajtok, Konzerves sajtok
lt: Konservuoti sūriai
nl: Kazen in blik/pot

en: Cured cheeses, cured cheese
ca: Formatge curat
es: Queso curado
hr: Sušeni sir

en: Semi-cured cheeses, semi-cured cheese
ca: Formatge semicurat
es: Queso semicurado
hr: Polusušeni sir

en: Abbaye cheeses
fr: Fromages d’abbaye
hr: Opatijski sirevi
nl: Abdijkazen, Abdijkaas
zh: 修道院奶酪

en: American cheeses
fr: fromages américains
zh: 美国奶酪

en: Colby cheese, Colby
ca: colby
hr: Colby sir
id: Keju colby
it: Colby
ja: コルビーチーズ
jv: Kèju colby
ko: 콜비 치즈
pt: Colby
zh: 考爾比芝士

en: Muenster cheese, Muenster
es: Muenster
hr: Muensterski sir
jv: Kèju Muenster
sv: Muenster
th: มึนสเตอร์ชีส

en: Cheeses from Norway, Norwegian Cheeses
fr: Fromages norvégiennes
hr: Sirevi iz norveške
nl: Noorse Kazen, Kazen uit Noorwegen
no: Norske Oster

en: Yellow cheeses
no: Gulost

en: Mexican cheeses, cheeses from Mexico
de: Mexikanischer Käse
es: Quesos mexicanos, Quesos de México
fi: meksikolaiset juustot
fr: Fromages mexicains, Fromages du Mexique
hr: Meksički sirevi
it: Formaggio messicano